Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1945.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13.7(b) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended to read:Section 13.7. Drug Overdose Response Immunity.--* * *(b) (1) The prohibition on charging or prosecuting a person as described in subsection (a) bars charging or prosecuting a person for probation and parole violations and for violations of section 13(a)(5), (16), (19), (31), (32), (33) and (37).(2) A person as described in subsection (a) may not be 12345678910111213141516171819202122 charged or prosecuted for an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2705 (relating to recklessly endangering another person).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1945PN2454 - 2 - 1234